Utah statutes.
63M-1-2402.   Findings.
(1)  The Legislature finds that:
(a)  to foster and develop industry in Utah is a public purpose necessary to
assure adequate employment for, and the welfare of, Utah's citizens and the
growth of the state's economy;
(b)  Utah loses prospective high paying jobs, new economic growth, and
corresponding incremental new state and local revenues to competing states
because of a wide variety of competing economic incentives offered by those
states; and
(c)  economic development initiatives and interests of state and local
economic development officials should be aligned and united in the creation of
higher paying jobs that will lift the wage levels of the communities in which
those jobs will be created.
(2)  This part is enacted to:
(a)  address the loss of prospective high paying jobs, the loss of new
economic growth, and the corresponding loss of incremental new state and local
revenues by providing tax credits to attract new commercial projects in
economic development zones in the state; and
(b)  provide a cooperative and unified working relationship between state and
local economic development efforts.
